Maine, session 132, LD1451.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-L, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14.
Maine Coordinating Council on Access and Not 23 MRSA §4271
Mobility Management Authorized
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA c. 410-B is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 410-B
MAINE COORDINATING COUNCIL ON ACCESS AND MOBILITY
MANAGEMENT
§4271. Maine Coordinating Council on Access and Mobility Management
The Maine Coordinating Council on Access and Mobility Management, established in
Title 5, section 12004-L, subsection 14, is established to issue policy recommendations and
undertake activities that improve the efficiency, accessibility and availability of
transportation for transportation-disadvantaged populations and shall serve as an advisory
council to the Department of Transportation and the Maine Office of Community Affairs
established in Title 5, section 3202.
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Council" means the Maine Coordinating Council on Access and Mobility
Management under this section.
B. "Mobility management" means management that focuses on meeting individuals'
needs through a wide range of transportation options and service providers and on
coordinating these services and providers to achieve a more efficient transportation
service delivery system.
C. "Mobility management hub" means a transportation hub that allows individuals to
access multiple modes of transportation in one location and is designed to be
welcoming and accessible to individuals of all mobility abilities.
D. "Transportation-disadvantaged populations" means populations of individuals who
because of physical or mental disability, income status or age are unable to transport
themselves or purchase transportation and as a result are dependent upon others to
obtain access to health care, employment, education, shopping, social activities or other
life-sustaining activities.
2. Council membership. The council consists of 6 members as follows:
A. The Commissioner of Transportation or the commissioner's designee;
B. The Commissioner of Health and Human Services or the commissioner's designee;
C. The Commissioner of Education or the commissioner's designee;
D. The Commissioner of Labor or the commissioner's designee;
Page 1 - 132LR1650(01)

E. The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development or the
commissioner's designee; and
F. The executive director of the Maine Turnpike Authority.
3. Council chair and vice-chair; staffing. The council shall annually elect a chair
and vice-chair from among its members, each of whom serves a term of one year. The
Department of Transportation shall staff and convene meetings of the council.
4. Council duties. The council shall:
A. Build interagency coordination between the Department of Transportation and the
Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Education, the
Department of Labor, the Department of Economic and Community Development and
other state agencies to increase efficiency and coordination of transportation funding
in the State;
B. Establish a mobility management approach among the state agencies under
paragraph A to increase efficiency, accessibility and sustainability of transportation
statewide and in regions across the State:
C. Establish mobility management hubs in 8 regions across the State to make more
efficient use of resources and leverage federal funds for public and community
transportation;
D. Use federal guidance to remove barriers to cost sharing in the State; and
E. Establish a timeline and a staffing and work plan for transportation coordination
activities between the Department of Transportation and the Department of Health and
Human Services and other state agencies.
Sec. 3. Coordinator of mobility management. The Commissioner of
Transportation shall appoint a state coordinator of mobility management located within the
Department of Transportation and the Maine Office of Community Affairs to support the
establishment of mobility management hubs in regions across the State and to serve as a
liaison to state agencies to support and advise on transportation access efforts.